Utah statutes.
10-9a-609.5.   Vacating a street, right-of-way, or easement.

(1)  A petition to vacate some or all of a public street, right-of-way, or easement shall include:

(a)  the name and address of each owner of record of land that is:

(i)  adjacent to the public street, right-of-way, or easement; or

(ii)  accessed exclusively by or within 300 feet of the public street, right-of-way, or easement; and

(b)  the signature of each owner under Subsection (1)(a) who consents to the vacation.

(2)  If a petition is submitted containing a request to vacate some or all of a street, right-of-way, or easement, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing in accordance with Section 10-9a-208 and determine whether:

(a)  good cause exists for the vacation; and

(b)  the public interest or any person will be materially injured by the proposed vacation.

(3)  The legislative body may adopt an ordinance granting a petition to vacate some or all of a public street, right-of-way, or easement if the legislative body finds that:

(a)  good cause exists for the vacation; and

(b)  neither the public interest nor any person will be materially injured by the vacation.

(4)  If the legislative body adopts an ordinance vacating some or all of a public street, right-of-way, or easement, the legislative body shall ensure that one or both of the following is recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is located:

(a)  a plat reflecting the vacation; or

(b)  an ordinance described in Subsection (3).

(5)  The action of the legislative body vacating some or all of a street, right-of-way, or easement that has been dedicated to public use:

(a)  operates to the extent to which it is vacated, upon the effective date of the recorded plat, as a revocation of the acceptance of and the relinquishment of the municipality's fee in the vacated street, right-of-way, or easement; and

(b)  may not be construed to impair:

(i)  any right-of-way or easement of any lot owner; or

(ii)  the franchise rights of any public utility.



Amended by Chapter 381, 2010 General Session

